Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.260

Board of adjustment—Organization.

The board of adjustment shall elect a chair and vice chair from among its members. The board of adjustment shall appoint a secretary who need not be a member of the board.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4116; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.260. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 26.]